cli/src/main/resources/wordguess_hunspell_pl.aff
SFX P Y 237
SFX P   eb        ba        eb
SFX P   eb        bowi      eb
SFX P   eb        bem       eb
SFX P   eb        bie       eb
SFX P   ew        wa        ew
SFX P   ew        wu        ew
SFX P   ew        wem       ew
SFX P   ew        wie       ew
SFX P   er        ra        [^i]er
SFX P   er        rowi      [^i]er
SFX P   er        rem       [^i]er
SFX P   er        rze       [^i]er
SFX P   iep       pa        iep
SFX P   iep       powi      iep
SFX P   iep       pem       iep
SFX P   iep       pie       iep
SFX P   ier       ra        ier
SFX P   ier       rowi      ier
SFX P   ier       rem       ier
SFX P   ier       rze       ier
SFX P   ies       sa        ies
SFX P   ies       su        ies
SFX P   ies       sem       ies
SFX P   ies       sie       ies
SFX P   en        na        [^i]en
SFX P   en        nowi      [^i]en
SFX P   en        nem       [^i]en
SFX P   en        nie       [^iz]en
SFX P   zen       źnie      zen
SFX P   el        la        [^i]el
SFX P   el        lowi      [^i]el
SFX P   el        lem       [^i]el
SFX P   el        lu        [^i]el
SFX P   iel       la        iel
SFX P   iel       lowi      iel
SFX P   iel       lem       iel
SFX P   iel       lu        iel
SFX P   ek        ka        [^i]ek
SFX P   ek        kowi      [^i]ek
SFX P   ek        kiem      [^i]ek
SFX P   ek        ku        [^i]ek
SFX P   ciek      ćka       ciek
SFX P   ciek      ćkowi     ciek
SFX P   ciek      ćkiem     ciek
SFX P   ciek      ćku       ciek
SFX P   niek      ńka       niek
SFX P   niek      ńkowi     niek
SFX P   niek      ńkiem     niek
SFX P   niek      ńku       niek
SFX P   siek      śka       siek
SFX P   siek      śkowi     siek
SFX P   siek      śkiem     siek
SFX P   siek      śku       siek
SFX P   ieć       cia       ieć
SFX P   ieć       ciowi     ieć
SFX P   ieć       ciem      ieć
SFX P   ieć       ciu       ieć
SFX P   eć        cia       [^i]eć
SFX P   eć        ciowi     [^i]eć
SFX P   eć        ciem      [^i]eć
SFX P   eć        ciu       [^i]eć
SFX P   ieł       ła        ieł
SFX P   ieł       łowi      ieł
SFX P   ieł       łem       ieł
SFX P   ieł       le        ieł
SFX P   iez       za        iez
SFX P   iez       zowi      iez
SFX P   iez       zem       iez
SFX P   iez       zie       iez
SFX P   eł        ła        [^r]zeł
SFX P   eł        łowi      [^r]zeł
SFX P   eł        łem       [^r]zeł
SFX P   zeł       źle       [^r]zeł
SFX P   zeł       ła        rzeł
SFX P   zeł       łu        rzeł
SFX P   zeł       łem       rzeł
SFX P   zeł       le        rzeł
SFX P   zec       ca        rzec
SFX P   zec       cowi      rzec
SFX P   zec       cem       rzec
SFX P   zec       cu        rzec
SFX P   ec        ca        [cs]zec
SFX P   ec        cowi      [cs]zec
SFX P   ec        cem       [cs]zec
SFX P   ec        cu        [cs]zec
SFX P   ec        ca        [djlpż]ec
SFX P   ec        cowi      [djlpż]ec
SFX P   ec        cem       [djlpż]ec
SFX P   ec        cu        [djlpż]ec
SFX P   niec      ńca       niec
SFX P   niec      ńcowi     niec
SFX P   niec      ńcem      niec
SFX P   niec      ńcu       niec
SFX P   iec       ca        [^cnsz]iec
SFX P   iec       cowi      [^cnsz]iec
SFX P   iec       cem       [^cnsz]iec
SFX P   iec       cu        [^cnsz]iec
SFX P   ziec      źca       ziec
SFX P   ziec      źcowi     ziec
SFX P   ziec      źcem      ziec
SFX P   ziec      źcu       ziec
SFX P   siec      śca       siec
SFX P   siec      ścowi     siec
SFX P   siec      ścem      siec
SFX P   siec      ścu       siec
SFX P   iec       a         jciec
SFX P   iec       u         jciec
SFX P   iec       em        jciec
SFX P   ciec      ćca       [^j]ciec
SFX P   ciec      ćcowi     [^j]ciec
SFX P   ciec      ćcem      [^j]ciec
SFX P   ciec      ćcu       [^j]ciec
SFX P   óbr       obra      óbr
SFX P   óbr       obrowi    óbr
SFX P   óbr       obrem     óbr
SFX P   óbr       obrze     óbr
SFX P   órg       orga      órg
SFX P   órg       orgowi    órg
SFX P   órg       orgiem    órg
SFX P   órg       orgu      órg
SFX P   ób        oba       ób
SFX P   ób        obowi     ób
SFX P   ób        obem      ób
SFX P   ób        obie      ób
SFX P   ód        oda       ód
SFX P   ód        odowi     ód
SFX P   ód        odem      ód
SFX P   ód        odzie     ód
SFX P   ódz       odza      ódz
SFX P   ódz       odzowi    ódz
SFX P   ódz       odzem     ódz
SFX P   ódz       odzu      ódz
SFX P   óźdź      oździa    óźdź
SFX P   óźdź      oździowi  óźdź
SFX P   óźdź      oździem   óźdź
SFX P   óźdź      oździu    óźdź
SFX P   óg        oga       óg
SFX P   óg        ogowi     óg
SFX P   óg        ogiem     óg
SFX P   óg        ogu       óg
SFX P   ój        oja       ój
SFX P   ój        ojowi     ój
SFX P   ój        ojem      ój
SFX P   ój        oju       ój
SFX P   ól        ola       ól
SFX P   ól        olowi     ól
SFX P   ól        olem      ól
SFX P   ól        olu       ól
SFX P   ół        oła       ół
SFX P   ół        ołowi     ół
SFX P   ół        ołem      ół
SFX P   ół        ole       [^i]ół
SFX P   ół        ele       ciół
SFX P   ół        ole       ziół
SFX P   ór        ora       ór
SFX P   ór        orowi     ór
SFX P   ór        orem      ór
SFX P   ór        orze      ór
SFX P   ót        ota       ót
SFX P   ót        otowi     ót
SFX P   ót        otem      ót
SFX P   ót        ocie      ót
SFX P   ów        owa       ów
SFX P   ów        owowi     ów
SFX P   ów        owem      ów
SFX P   ów        owie      ów
SFX P   óż        oża       óż
SFX P   óż        ożowi     óż
SFX P   óż        ożem      óż
SFX P   óż        ożu       óż
SFX P   óz        oza       óz
SFX P   óz        ozowi     óz
SFX P   óz        ozem      óz
SFX P   óz        ozie      óz
SFX P   0         a         at
SFX P   0         u         at
SFX P   0         em        at
SFX P   at        cie       at
SFX P   ąb        ęba       ąb
SFX P   ąb        ębowi     ąb
SFX P   ąb        ębem      ąb
SFX P   ąb        ębie      ąb
SFX P   ądz       ędza      ądz
SFX P   ądz       ędzu      ądz
SFX P   ądz       ędzem     ądz
SFX P   ąz        ęza       ąz
SFX P   ąz        ęzowi     ąz
SFX P   ąz        ęzem      ąz
SFX P   ąz        ęzie      ąz
SFX P   ąż        ęża       ąż
SFX P   ąż        ężowi     ąż
SFX P   ąż        ężem      ąż
SFX P   ąż        ężu       ąż
SFX P   eł        ła        [bpsż]eł
SFX P   eł        łowi      [bpsż]eł
SFX P   eł        łem       [bpsż]eł
SFX P   eł        le        [bpż]eł
SFX P   seł       śle       seł
SFX P   cień      tnia      cień
SFX P   cień      tniowi    cień
SFX P   cień      tniem     cień
SFX P   cień      tniu      cień
SFX P   ień       nia       [pg]ień
SFX P   ień       niowi     [pg]ień
SFX P   ień       niem      [pg]ień
SFX P   ień       niu       [pg]ień
SFX P   sień      śnia      sień
SFX P   sień      śniowi    sień
SFX P   sień      śniem     sień
SFX P   sień      śniu      sień
SFX P   zień      źnia      [^d]zień
SFX P   zień      źniowi    [^d]zień
SFX P   zień      źniem     [^d]zień
SFX P   zień      źniu      [^d]zień
SFX P   zień      nia       dzień
SFX P   zień      niowi     dzień
SFX P   zień      niem      dzień
SFX P   zień      niu       dzień
SFX P   eń        nia       [rtzż]eń
SFX P   eń        niowi     [rtzż]eń
SFX P   eń        niem      [rtzż]eń
SFX P   eń        niu       [rtzż]eń
SFX P   cioł      tła       cioł
SFX P   cioł      tłowi     cioł
SFX P   cioł      tłem      cioł
SFX P   cioł      tle       cioł
SFX P   zioł      zła       zioł
SFX P   zioł      złowi     zioł
SFX P   zioł      złem      zioł
SFX P   zioł      źle       zioł
SFX P   ioł       ła        sioł
SFX P   ioł       łowi      sioł
SFX P   ioł       łem       sioł
SFX P   sioł      śle       sioł
SFX P   o         y         ło
SFX P   ło        le        ło
SFX P   o         em        ło
