cli/src/main/resources/wordguess_hunspell_pl.dic
adidasek/PSZz
aksamitek/PSZz
amarylek/PSZz
Andrzejek/PSZwz
antyhitlerowiec/PSZtz
apartamentowiec/PSZz
aspergerowiec/PSZtz
azylowiec/PSZtz
badylek/PSZz
baldachokwiatowiec/PSZz
bandanek/PSZz
Barchaczów/P
Baszków/P
bączek/PSZz
belfer/PSZtwz
berlaczek/PSZz
bezjądrowiec/PSZz
bezpłaszczowiec/PSZtz
bezzałogowiec/PSZz
Bichniów/P
bielec/PSZz
Bieździadów/P
Bisztynek/P
Bliżów/P
błękitniczek/PSZz
Bobrek/P
Bodek/PSZwz
bogomolec/PSZtz
Bojszów/P
Boniek/PSZwz
Borów/P
bóbr/PSZz
bratek/PSZwz
Broniek/PSZwz
bruzdkowiec/PSZz
Brzostek/PSZwzR
Budek/PSZwz
Bukowiec/PSZwz
bursztynek/PSZz
byczek/PSZz
campingowiec/PSZtz
Celowiec/P
Chabierów/P
Chełstów/P
chlorowiec/PSZz
Chocimów/P
chołodziec/PSZz
chowaniec/PSZtz
Chrzanów/P
chujek/PSZz
ciążek/PSZz
ciemnotek/PSZz
Ciosek/PSZwz
cnotliwiec/PSZtz
cynamonek/PSZz
Czarnogłów/P
Czerniec/PSZwz
czteropiętrowiec/PSZz
Ćmielów/P
Dąb/NOPSTZosz
dieselek/PSZz
Dobrzelów/P
Dorobek/PSZwz
drobnicowiec/PSZz
dunder/PSZz
dwunastosylabowiec/PSZz
dymek/PSZzR
dziedziniec/PSZz
dzióbeczek/PSZz
eksmąż/PSZwz
erasmusowiec/PSZtz
fakulec/PSZz
Ficek/PSZwz
fistaszek/PSZz
frachtowiec/PSZz
fyrtel/CPSZz
Garczarek/PSZwz
Gendek/PSZwz
glinowiec/PSZz
głuszec/PSZz
Golec/PSZwz
Gorzów/P
grajek/PSZwz
Grotek/PSZwz
grzbietoród/PSZz
gwarek/PSZwzR
harlejowiec/PSZtz
Hieronimek/PSZwz
huczek/PSZzR
imbirowiec/PSZz
Jacek/PSZwz
Janowiec/P
Jasiniec/P
jednomasztowiec/PSZz
jesionowiec/PSZz
Józefów/P
kacykowiec/PSZz
kalkulatorek/PSZz
kanialec/PSZz
karaluszek/PSZz
kartuzek/PSZz
kazetempowiec/PSZtz
Kiełczygłów/P
kinderek/PSZz
Klepczarek/PSZwz
klusek/PSZz
knedliczek/PSZz
Kolanek/PSZwz
kominek/PSZz
kontraktowiec/PSZtz
koriander/PSZz
Kosnowiec/P
kotawiec/PSZz
Kożuchów/P
krążeniowiec/PSZtz
Krogulec/PSZwz
kryminałek/PSZz
krzywoząb/PSZz
kufer/PSZz
kurdybanek/PSZz
Kwasowiec/P
latarniowiec/PSZz
Lelonek/PSZwz
lewicowiec/PSZtz
lipowiec/PSZz
Lojzek/PSZwz
Luboradek/PSZwz
Lulek/PSZwz
Łapszów/P
łokietek/PSZwz
Łyczek/PSZwz
magazynek/PSZz
Malcharek/PSZwz
mangrowiec/PSZz
marsżagiel/CPZz
Matyldów/P
Merkel/NOPSTZoswz
Michrów/P
migdałek/PSZz
minipączek/PSZz
Mirów/P
mleczajowiec/PSZz
Mocek/PSZwz
Moraków/P
moździerzowiec/PSZtz
Mściwojów/P
muszlowiec/PSZz
Myśliwczów/P
nagłówek/PSZz
naparstek/PSZz
Nedeżów/P
Niedaszów/P
niekrasowiec/PSZtz
nieułomek/PSZz
nogietek/PSZz
Nurek/PSZwzR
obliczeniowiec/PSZtz
obwarzanek/PSZz
odrzutek/PSZwz
Ogorzelec/P
okrągłostołowiec/PSZtz
Olsztynek/P
opłatek/PSZz
oscypek/PSZz
Ostałówek/P
ośmiolatek/PSZwz
Ozorków/P
palcochód/PSZzR
papeć/CPZz
Parzyszek/PSZwz
Pawelec/PSZwz
Pelagiuszek/PSZwz
petrelek/PSZz
Piątek/PSZwzR
Pierściec/P
pięknoróg/PSZz
Piotrek/PSZwz
piździelec/PSZtz
płacheć/AMZCPz
pniakowiec/PSZz
podjezdek/PSZz
podświnek/PSZz
pokolec/PSZz
pomniczek/PSZz
Porfiriuszek/PSZwz
potępieniec/PSZtz
półćwiartek/PSZz
półpasiec/PSZz
prakopytowiec/PSZz
prążek/PSZz
Prościeniec/P
przeddziedziniec/PSZz
przełazek/PSZz
przychodzień/CPSZz
przymrozek/PSZz
psiutek/PSZz
Pudłowiec/P
pyłowiec/PSZz
Radłów/P
Raniżów/P
Reduchów/P
ręczyniec/PSZz
rolkowiec/PSZtz
rozbitek/PSZwz
rozwiertek/PSZz
ruchaniec/PSZz
rwaniec/PSZz
Rzeczniów/P
sadzulec/PSZz
Sarosiek/PSZwz
serdaczek/PSZz
siczowiec/PSZtz
sierpień/CPSZz
Siwiec/PSZwz
Skierbieszów/P
skóbel/CPZz
Skrzyszów/P
słuchowiec/PSZtz
smrodek/PSZzR
Sokołówek/P
spawęzek/PSZz
srajdek/PSZz
staruszeczek/PSZwz
Stępień/PSZwz
strączyniec/PSZz
Strzeszów/P
Sulechów/P
surfingowiec/PSZtz
sylabowiec/PSZz
Szafraniec/PSZwz
szczeciogonek/PSZz
szczuroskoczek/PSZz
Szklanów/P
szorek/PSZz
sztywniaczek/PSZz
Szymoszek/PSZwz
Śmiejek/PSZwz
śrutowiec/PSZtz
Święciec/P
tamaryndowiec/PSZz
taśmowiec/PSZz
Teremiec/P
tłuszczowiec/PSZz
toporzec/PSZz
traperek/PSZz
trójkołowiec/PSZz
Trzciniec/P
Trzygłów/P
Turek/PSZtzwR
Tylec/PSZwz
uczuleniowiec/PSZtz
undergroundowiec/PSZtz
Usarzów/P
wafelek/PSZz
wałęsowiec/PSZtz
wawrzynowiec/PSZz
wełnowiec/PSZz
węgrzynek/PSZwz
wicionóg/PSZz
wielokadłubowiec/PSZz
Wierzbinek/P
Wilczek/PSZwz
wiórowiec/PSZz
włoczek/PSZz
Wojaczek/PSZwz
woniawiec/PSZz
wrotek/PSZz
współziomek/PSZwz
wydmuchów/PSZz
wyrachowaniec/PSZtz
Wyszków/P
Zacheuszek/PSZwz
zajączek/PSZz
zapachowiec/PSZtz
Zasów/P
zbiorniczek/PSZz
Zebrzydów/P
zgorzknialec/PSZtz
zlepieniec/PSZz
Zofianów/P
zwrotek/PSZz
żarlinek/PSZz
żłóbeczek/PSZz
żurawiec/PSZz
